District of Columbia statutes.
8-241.02

Indoor mold assessment and remediation standards.

(a)

Consistent with applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency or U.S. Department of Labor, Occupational Safety and Health Administration guidelines and regulations relating to the assessment and remediation of mold, the Director shall:

(1)

Set a threshold level of indoor mold contamination that requires professional indoor mold remediation at residential properties;

(2)

Establish scientific and objective methods to be used by individuals certified by the District when conducting an indoor mold assessment;

(3)

Establish minimum performance standards and work practices for conducting professional indoor mold remediation in the District; and

(4)

Establish guidelines for the removal of indoor mold below the threshold set by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(b)

When professional indoor mold remediation is required under §  8-241.04 because a professional indoor mold assessment found indoor mold contamination at a property, the Director may require the property owner to provide a remediation report from an indoor mold remediation professional to the tenant and to the Department of the Environment.

Sept. 9, 2014, D.C. Law 20-135, § 303, 61 DCR 6767

History